Arkansas, session 2025, SB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1104 is amended to read as follows:
26-18-1104. Definition Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, “taxpayer”:
(1) “Small claim” means a claim in which the disputed tax at
issue, excluding any penalties and interest, is less than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000); and
(2) “Taxpayer” means an individual or entity that:
(1)(A) Is challenging the state's taxing jurisdiction over
the taxpayer; or
(2)(B) Has standing to challenge a decision by the
Department of Finance and Administration:
(A)(i) Imposing liability for a tax, penalty, or
interest;
(B)(ii) Denying a credit or deduction;
(C)(iii) Denying a refund, credit, or incentive
claim or application;
(D)(iv) Canceling, refusing, or revoking a license
or permit under § 26-18-601, § 26-52-803, § 26-55-219, § 26-55-224, § 26-55-
*JLL127*
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529
231, § 26-56-204, § 26-56-311, § 26-57-413, § 26-57-419, or § 26-62-204;
(E)(v) Closing a noncompliant taxpayer's business;
(F)(vi) Relating to a jeopardy assessment;
(G)(vii) Seizing a vending device or a coin-operated
amusement device; or
(H)(viii) Taking any other action that provides a
taxpayer the right to a hearing with the Tax Appeals Commission under state
law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1106(d), concerning the appointment
of commissioners to the Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) Each commissioner shall receive an annual salary and benefits
comparable to the salary and benefits provided to state district court judges
as prescribed by law and appropriated by the General Assembly.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1106(f)(3)(A), concerning the
appointment of commissioners of the Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to
read as follows:
(3)(A) The Governor may appoint:
(i) A commissioner to fill a vacancy from the
relevant pool of candidates nominated under this subsection; or
(ii) An individual not nominated under this
subsection who meets the applicable licensure requirements of a particular
pool has at least five (5) years' experience in a professional occupation
related to Arkansas state taxes and who otherwise meets the qualification
requirements stated in § 26-18-1107.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1107(a), concerning the
qualifications of commissioners of the Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) Each commissioner of the Tax Appeals Commission shall:
(1) Be a qualified elector of the State of Arkansas;
(2) Either:
(A) Be licensed to practice law in the state or certified
as a certified public accountant in the state, or both; or
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529
(B) Shall have at least five (5) years' experience in a
professional occupation related to Arkansas state taxes; and
(3) Possess substantial knowledge of Arkansas tax law.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1109(a), concerning employees of the
Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Tax Appeals Commission:
(1) May employ a clerk, an assistant, and other may hire
employees as necessary to carry out the duties of the commission; and
(2) Shall employ:
(A)(i) A staff attorney.
(ii) The duties of the staff attorney shall include
without limitation assisting the commissioners with drafting decisions; and
(B) An accountant who has experience in tax issues related
to manufacturing and business.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1110(a)(4)(B), concerning the
jurisdiction of the Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The commission shall not extend the deadline for:
(i) A taxpayer to file a petition under § 26-18-
1113; or
(ii) The commission to issue a decision, except as
otherwise provided under § 26-18-1116(b).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1110(b) and (c), concerning the
jurisdiction of the Tax Appeals Commission, are amended to read as follows:
(b) The commission does not have jurisdiction to:
(1) Hear disputes involving taxes that are excepted from the
Arkansas Tax Procedure Act under § 26-18-102;
(2) Decide questions regarding the constitutionality of the
application of statutes to a taxpayer or the constitutionality of rules
promulgated by the department;
(3) Hear a claim for protection against enforcement of an
illegal exaction under Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 13; or
(4) Hear or decide claims for which the Office of Hearings and
Appeals has issued an administrative decision; or
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529
(5) Hear or decide a claim that is the subject of pending
litigation.
(c) Upon the creation of the commission:
(1) The Office of Hearings and Appeals shall hear a proceeding
resulting from an action or decision by the secretary, including without
limitation the issuance of a proposed assessment, a refund claim denial, or
any other matter brought by a taxpayer, that was issued before January 1,
2023;
(2) The commission shall hear a proceeding resulting from an
action or decision by the secretary, including without limitation the
issuance of a proposed assessment, a refund claim denial, or any other matter
brought by a taxpayer, that was issued on or after January 1, 2023; and
(3) A taxpayer that has a matter pending before the Office of
Hearings and Appeals for which a hearing or prehearing has not been held may
elect to have the taxpayer's matter transferred to the commission.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1111(b), concerning the settlement of
tax disputes under the Independent Tax Appeals Commission Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) If a matter is settled after a petition has been filed with the
Tax Appeals Commission under this subchapter, the parties shall notify the
commission so that the matter is withdrawn file a motion to withdraw the
matter from consideration by the commission.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1113(c)-(f), concerning pleadings
filed under the Independent Tax Appeals Commission Act, are amended to read
as follows:
(c)(1) The department shall file an answer to a petition filed under
this section within sixty (60) days of receipt of the notice from the
commission under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(2)(A) The department shall serve a copy of the answer on the
taxpayer's representative, or, if the taxpayer is not represented, on the
taxpayer directly.
(B) An attorney's certification that the attorney sent the
pleading by a means of service authorized under § 26-18-1112 is sufficient
proof of service under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section.
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529
(d)(1) A taxpayer may:
(A)(1) File a reply to an answer filed under subsection
(c) of this section within thirty (30) days of the date the answer was served
on the taxpayer or the authorized representative of the taxpayer; or
(B)(2) Move for default judgment if no answer was filed,
unless the petition was for a small claim.
(2) The taxpayer shall:
(A) Serve a copy of a reply filed under subdivision (d)(1)
of this section on the authorized representative of the department; and
(B)(i) File proof of service of the reply filed under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section with the reply.
(ii) A certification by the taxpayer or the
authorized representative of the taxpayer stating that he or she sent the
pleading by a means of service authorized under § 26-18-1112 is sufficient
proof of service under subdivision (d)(2)(B)(i) of this section.
(e)(1)(A) Within thirty (30) days after a reply has been filed or the
deadline to file a reply has passed, the commission shall schedule a hearing
to be held within ninety (90) days of the date the reply was filed or the
deadline to file a reply passed.
(B) For a small claim, if either party requests a hearing
and the commission elects to hold a hearing, within thirty (30) days of
service of the petition on the department, the commission shall schedule a
hearing, which shall occur within sixty (60) days of service of the petition
on the department.
(2)(A) Before scheduling a hearing under this section, the Chief
Commissioner of the Tax Appeals Commission shall assign the proceeding to one
(1) commissioner or to all available commissioners sitting en banc, depending
on the nature and significance of the proceeding.
(B) There is a presumption that proceedings:
(i) For which the net amount of the tax deficiencies
and claimed refunds in controversy does not exceed twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000), exclusive of interest and penalties, should be assigned to
one (1) commissioner;
(ii) Identified in subsection (g) of this section
should be assigned to one (1) commissioner; and
(iii) For which the net amount of the tax
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529
deficiencies and claimed refunds in controversy exceeds two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000), exclusive of interest and penalties, should be
assigned to all commissioners sitting en banc.
(3) Before a hearing is held, the chief commissioner may
reassign the proceeding to one (1) commissioner or to all commissioners
sitting en banc.
(4) For a petition to be decided on written submissions,
including a petition for a small claim, the commission shall provide for the
orderly close of the record without a hearing.
(f)(1) Either party may amend a pleading one (1) time without leave at
any time before the period for responding to the pleading expires.
(2) After the period for responding to a pleading expires, a
pleading may be amended only with the written consent of the adverse party or
with the permission of the commission.
(3) The commission shall allow a party to file an answer or
reply, or both, to an amended pleading, and the commission shall specify a
deadline for filing the answer or reply, or both.
(4) A taxpayer shall not amend the taxpayer's petition after the
expiration of the time for filing a petition if the amended petition would
have the effect of conferring jurisdiction over a matter that would otherwise
not come within the jurisdiction of the commission because of the statute of
limitations or otherwise.
(5) The commission shall provide notice of an amended pleading
to the adverse party.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1113, concerning pleadings filed
under the Independent Tax Appeals Commission Act, is amended to add
additional subsections to read as follows:
(h) A petition for a small claim is subject to a streamlined
proceeding process as prescribed by the commission unless, upon the election
of the commission or a motion of a party, the commission designates
otherwise.
(i) The commission may stay proceedings under this subchapter,
including proceedings on a petition for a small claim, and direct the parties
to confer regarding a voluntary resolution to the dispute on which a petition
is based.
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1115(j), concerning hearings under
the Independent Tax Appeals Commission Act, is amended to read as follows:
(j) Except in a case involving the denial of a claim for refund or a
small claim, the taxpayer shall have the right to have the taxpayer's case
heard before paying any of the amounts asserted as due by the Department of
Finance and Administration.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1115(l), concerning hearings under
the Independent Tax Appeals Commission Act, is amended to read as follows:
(l)(1) A taxpayer may elect to have the taxpayer's petition heard:
(A) In person;
(B) By teleconference;
(C) By videoconference;
(D) By any combination of in-person, teleconferencing, or
videoconferencing means; or
(E) Solely upon the documents filed with the commission.
(2) The taxpayer shall make an election under subdivision (l)(1)
of this section in the taxpayer's initial petition.
(3) If the taxpayer fails to make an election under subdivision
(l)(1) of this section in the taxpayer's initial petition, the petition shall
be set for an in-person hearing in Little Rock with an option for the
taxpayer to participate by teleconference or videoconference.
(4)(3) The taxpayer may amend an election under this subsection:
(A) Up to the date the taxpayer's reply is filed or due to
be filed; or
(B) With the consent of the commission after notice to the
department and an opportunity to be heard.
(5)(4) The department may elect to appear by teleconference or
videoconference for a hearing.
(6)(5) The commission may require a hearing by a means other
than the means elected by the taxpayer for good cause or when it is in the
interest of justice.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1116(b)(1), concerning decisions of
the Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to read as follows:
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529
(b)(1)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section,
a decision of the commission under this section shall be issued no later than
ninety (90) days after the submission of the last pleading or brief filed or
the completion of the hearing or the closure of the record, whichever is
later.
(B) The commission shall issue a decision:
(i) Within five (5) business days after a hearing is
concluded under § 26-18-402;
(ii) Within three (3) business days after a hearing
is concluded under § 26-18-601(b);
(iii)(ii) Within five (5) business days after a
hearing is concluded under § 26-18-402, § 26-18-1002, § 26-55-247, or § 26-
57-1212; and
(iv)(iii) Within twenty (20) calendar days after a
hearing is concluded under § 26-18-507(e)(1)(B)(ii), § 26-18-601(c), or § 26-
36-315(c), § 26-55-224, § 26-55-231, § 26-56-204, § 26-56-311, § 26-57-413, §
26-62-204, or § 26-57-419;
(v) Within twenty (20) calendar days after a hearing
is concluded under § 26-55-224, § 26-56-204, or § 26-62-204;
(vi) Within twenty (20) calendar days after a
hearing is concluded under § 26-55-231, § 26-56-311, § 26-57-413, or § 26-57-
419;
(vii) Within five (5) business days after a hearing
is concluded under § 26-55-247; and
(viii) Within five (5) business days after a hearing
is concluded under § 26-57-1212.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1116(d)(1), concerning decisions of
the Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The interpretation of a taxing statute adopted by the
commission in a proceeding en banc shall be followed by the commission in
subsequent cases involving the same statute.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1118(a)(3), concerning
representation of a taxpayer under the Independent Tax Appeals Commission
Act, is amended to read as follows:
03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127

SB529
(3) If the taxpayer fails to attach a power of attorney to the
petition, the commission shall allow the taxpayer thirty (30) calendar days
from notice of the deficiency to file the required power of attorney.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1120 is amended to read as follows:
26-18-1120. Rules.
The Tax Appeals Commission shall promulgate rules and forms to:
(1) Carry out the intent and purpose of this subchapter; and
(2) Implement the duties assigned to the commission, including
without limitation rules:
(A) Governing pleadings and service of process
requirements to commence a hearing under this subchapter and the practice and
procedure rules of the commission;
(B) To provide for expedited proceedings;
(C) To establish guidelines for the redaction of
personally identifying taxpayer information in published decisions; and
(D) To establish a procedure for petitions and hearings
under:
(i) Section 26-18-402;
(ii) Section 26-18-601(b) and (c);
(iii) Section 26-18-1002;
(iv) Section 26-36-315;
(v) Section 26-55-219;
(vi) Section 26-55-224;
(vii) Section 26-55-231;
(viii) Section 26-55-247;
(ix) Section 26-56-204;
(x) Section 26-56-311;
(xi) Section 26-57-413;
(xii) Section 26-57-419;
(xiii) Section 26-57-1212; and
(xiv) Section 26-62-204.




03/19/2025 6:28:09 PM JLL127